West Virginia, session 2025, SB584.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. OFFENSES AND PENALTIES. §60A-4-416. Drug delivery resulting in death; failure to render aid. (a) Any person who knowingly and willfully delivers a controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance in violation of the provisions of section four hundred one, article four of this chapter for an illicit purpose and the use, ingestion or consumption of the controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance alone or in combination with one or more other controlled substances, proximately causes the death of a person using, ingesting or consuming the controlled substance, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for a determinate sentence of not less than three nor more than fifteen years life, which sentence may not be suspended.(b) Any person who, while engaged in the illegal use of a controlled substance with another, who knowingly fails to seek medical assistance for such other person when the other person suffers an overdose of the controlled substance or suffers a significant adverse physical reaction to the controlled substance and the overdose or adverse physical reaction proximately causes the death of the other person, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned for not less than one year nor more than five years.